District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.13

Shares — Power to issue; classes; par value; limitations, restrictions, or qualifications; voting power; preferred or special classes.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 185, ch. 269, § 13
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(f), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.13.
1981 Ed., § 29-313.
1973 Ed., § 29-908.

Prior Codifications